Utah statutes.
53A-15-302.   State director of special education -- Qualifications -- Duties.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall appoint a state director of special education, who shall be qualified and experienced in the area of special education.

(2)  The state director has the following duties and responsibilities:

(a)  to assist the state board and state superintendent of public instruction in performing their duties under this chapter;

(b)  to encourage and assist school districts and other authorized public agencies in the organization of programs for students with disabilities;

(c)  to provide general supervision over all public programs offered through a public school, public agency, public institution, or private agency for students with disabilities;

(d)  to cooperate with private schools and other private agencies concerned with educating and training students with  disabilities; and

(e)  to coordinate all state programs for students with  disabilities.



Amended by Chapter 53, 1992 General Session

